Maryland, session 2025, SB1015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 22–1001 and 22–1001.1 of Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis of
the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 22–1001.1 and 22–1001.2,
respectively.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1015*

SENATE BILL 1015
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
22–102.
This title applies only in Harford County.
22–1001.
(A) THERE IS:
(1) A 6–DAY CLASS AF (ATHLETIC FIELD) BEER AND WINE LICENSE;
AND
(2) A 7–DAY CLASS AF (ATHLETIC FIELD) BEER AND WINE LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE 6–DAY OR THE 7–DAY LICENSE ONLY TO A
PERSON WHO LEASES, OWNS, OR OPERATES AN ATHLETIC FIELD FOR PROFIT.
(C) (1) A 6–DAY LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL
BEER AND WINE FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION MONDAY THROUGH SATURDAY,
FROM 12 P.M. TO 9 P.M.
(2) A 7–DAY LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL
BEER AND WINE FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION MONDAY THROUGH SUNDAY,
FROM 12 P.M. TO 9 P.M.
(D) A LICENSE HOLDER SHALL PURCHASE BEER AND WINE FROM AN
AUTHORIZED AND LICENSED WHOLESALER.
(E) A LICENSE HOLDER SHALL PROVIDE PREPACKAGED FOOD OR SNACKS
AT ALL TIMES WHEN BEER AND WINE ARE SOLD.
(F) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEES ARE:
(1) $1,300 FOR A 6–DAY LICENSE; AND
(2) $1,400 FOR A 7–DAY LICENSE.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.